Massachusetts, session 194th, H2730.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of Chapter 6E (a) of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after the
words “Massachusetts Bar Association” the words: “1 of whom shall be an active POST
Certified law enforcement officer below the rank of Captain from a department less than 50
officers, 1 of whom shall be an active POST Certified law enforcement officer below the rank of
Captain from a department with 50 or more officers. Any POST Commissioner representing a
labor organization must be POST certified and only one person from a police organization or
police department may be appointed to the POST Commission at any one time.
of 1